Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-309
Board of trustees; memorandum of understanding
with State Board of Education; policy to share student data.

The Board of Trustees
of the Nebraska State Colleges shall enter into a memorandum of understanding
on or before September 1, 2010, with the State Board of Education to adopt
a policy to share student data. At a minimum, the policy shall ensure that
the exchange of information is conducted in conformance with the requirements
of the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, as amended,
20 U.S.C. 1232g, and all federal regulations and applicable guidelines adopted
in accordance with such act, as such act, regulations, and guidelines existed
on January 1, 2010.

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 35.